Maryland, session 2025, HB0081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
12–105.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0081*

HOUSE BILL 81
(a) In this section, the phrase “the effective date of legislative authority for the
acquisition of the property” means, with respect to a condemnor vested with continuing
power of condemnation, the date of specific administrative determination to acquire the
property.
(b) (1) (I) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE fair market value of property in a condemnation proceeding is the price as of the
valuation date for the highest and best use of the property which a vendor, willing but not
obligated to sell, would accept for the property, and which a purchaser, willing but not
obligated to buy, would pay, excluding any increment in value proximately caused by the
public project for which the property condemned is needed. [In addition, fair]
(II) FAIR market value includes any amount by which the price
reflects a diminution in value occurring between the effective date of legislative authority
for the acquisition of the property and the date of actual taking if the trier of facts finds
that the diminution in value was proximately caused by the public project for which the
property condemned is needed, or by announcements or acts of the plaintiff or its officials
concerning the public project, and was beyond the reasonable control of the property owner.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO PROPERTY THAT IS
ACTIVELY USED FOR FARM OR AGRICULTURAL PURPOSES AS DETERMINED BY THE
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION UNDER § 8–209 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE, INCLUDING PROPERTY ACQUIRED BY CONDEMNATION
FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OR MAINTENANCE OF A TRANSMISSION LINE UNDER §§
7–207 AND 7–208 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(II) THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF PROPERTY ACTIVELY USED
FOR FARM OR AGRICULTURAL PURPOSES IN A CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING SHALL
BE 350% OF THE HIGHEST APPRAISAL VALUE OF THE PROPERTY.
(c) The defendant property owner may elect to present as evidence in a
condemnation proceeding, the assessed value of the property, as determined by the
Department of Assessments and Taxation, if the assessed value is greater than the
appraised value placed on the property by the condemning authority.
(d) (1) [If] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IF property is ever acquired by the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
the fair market value of the property is not affected by the property having been qualified
for a tax credit under § 9–208 of the Tax – Property Article. [However, if]
(2) IF the grantee of an easement purchased the easement for monetary
consideration other than, or in addition to, the tax credit under § 9–208 of the
Tax – Property Article, then the condemnation award shall be reduced by an amount equal
to the additional consideration.

HOUSE BILL 81 3
Article – Tax – Property
8–209.
(a) The General Assembly declares that it is in the general public interest of the
State to foster and encourage farming activities to:
(1) maintain a readily available source of food and dairy products close to
the metropolitan areas of the State;
(2) encourage the preservation of open space as an amenity necessary for
human welfare and happiness; and
(3) prevent the forced conversion of open space land to more intensive uses
because of the economic pressures caused by the assessment of the land at rates or levels
incompatible with its practical use for farming.
(b) It is the intention of the General Assembly that the assessment of farmland:
(1) be maintained at levels compatible with the continued use of the land
for farming; and
(2) not be affected adversely by neighboring land uses of a more intensive
nature.
(c) Land that is actively used for farm or agricultural use shall be valued on the
basis of that use and may not be valued as if subdivided.
(d) Land that is valued under subsection (c) of this section shall be assessed on
the basis of its use value.
(e) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Agrivoltaics” has the meaning stated in § 7–237 of this article.
(iii) “Community solar energy generating system” has the meaning
stated in § 7–306.2 of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the Department
shall establish in regulations criteria to determine if land that appears to be actively used
for farm or agricultural purposes:
(i) is actually used for farm or agricultural purposes; and
(ii) qualifies for assessment under this section.

HOUSE BILL 81
(3) The criteria shall include:
(i) the zoning of the land;
(ii) the present and past use of the land including land under the Soil
Bank Program of the United States;
(iii) the productivity of the land, including timberlands and
reforested lands; and
(iv) the gross income that is derived from the agricultural activity.
(4) (i) This paragraph applies through the life cycle of a community
solar energy generating system that:
1. is placed in service after June 30, 2022; and
2. has been approved on or before December 31, 2025, as a
community solar energy generating system by the Public Service Commission under §
7–306.2 of the Public Utilities Article.
(ii) The Department shall assess and qualify land that is used by a
community solar energy generating system for agrivoltaics as land that is actively used for
farm or agricultural purposes.
(f) In administering this section, periodically, the Director shall consult with:
(1) the Secretary of Agriculture;
(2) officials of the State who are knowledgeable in agriculture;
(3) representatives of the agricultural community;
(4) officials of counties and municipal corporations; and
(5) other persons as determined by the Director.
(g) (1) In this subsection the following words have the meanings indicated:
(i) “actively used” means land that is actually and primarily used
for a continuing farm or agricultural use;
(ii) “agricultural land unit” means the combination of not more than
3 parcels of land when the parcels are:
1. located in the same county; and

HOUSE BILL 81 5
2. under the same ownership;
(iii) “average gross income” means the average of the 2 highest years
of gross income during a 3–year period;
(iv) “family farm unit” means not more than 1 parcel of land of less
than 20 acres for each immediate family member for land that is:
1. contiguous to land receiving the farm or agricultural use
assessment; and
2. owned by a member or members of the immediate family
of the owner of the farm or agricultural use land; and
(v) “gross income” means the actual income that is received in a
calendar year that results directly from the farm or agricultural use of the land.
(2) In determining if a parcel of land of less than 20 acres, or not zoned for
agricultural use, is actively used, the Department may require the owner of the land to
affirm, under oath, on a standard form provided by the Department that the farm or
agricultural use of the land results in an average gross income of at least $2,500 from the
parcel or the agricultural land unit.
(3) The Department may require an owner who submits an affirmation
under paragraph (2) of this subsection to verify the gross income from the land by providing:
(i) copies of sales receipts or invoices;
(ii) lease agreements; or
(iii) other documents required by the Department.
(4) An affirmation under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be filed
before July 1 of the taxable year.
(5) If land that appears to be actively used does not yield an average gross
income of $2,500, the Director shall waive the gross income requirement on finding that:
(i) the land is leased and the nature of the farm or agricultural use
of the land when related to the amount of the land in farm or agricultural use reasonably
would be expected to yield an average gross income of at least $2,500;
(ii) the nature of the farm or agricultural use of the land and the
amount of the land in farm or agricultural use reasonably would be expected to yield an
average gross income of at least $2,500 from the agricultural products, if sold, that are
derived from the use of the land;

HOUSE BILL 81
(iii) a drought or other natural cause has adversely affected the
income–producing capability of the land during a 3–year period; or
(iv) for a newly established farm or agricultural use, the nature of
the use and the amount of the land in farm or agricultural use reasonably would be expected
to yield an average gross income of at least $2,500 if the use had existed for a 3–year period.
(6) The Director may grant only the following additional waivers:
(i) under paragraph (5)(iii) of this subsection, for 1 additional
consecutive 3–year period; and
(ii) under paragraph (5)(iv) of this subsection, for 1 additional
consecutive 3–year period.
(7) The gross income requirement of paragraph (2) of this subsection does
not apply if the land is actively used as a family farm unit.
(8) For purposes of qualifying for the agricultural use assessment under
this section, the following real property is deemed to be a single contiguous parcel:
(i) parcels that are created or separated by roads, easements, or
other rights–of–way; and
(ii) land relating to a right–of–way that reverts back to its owner’s
use for purposes of farming.
(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the following land does not
qualify to be assessed under this section:
(i) land rezoned to a more intensive use than the use that
immediately preceded the rezoning, if a person with an ownership interest in the land has
applied for or requested the rezoning;
(ii) land used as a homesite, which means the area of land that is
reasonably related to a dwelling;
(iii) parcels of land of less than 3 acres that are under the same
ownership excluding the homesite unless:
1. the land is owned by an owner of adjoining land that is
receiving the farm or agricultural use assessment and is actively used;
2. the owner receives at least 51% of the owner’s gross
income from the active use; or
3. the parcels are part of a family farm unit;

HOUSE BILL 81 7
(iv) if part of a subdivision plat, parcels of land of less than 10 acres
that are owned by an owner of 5 other parcels of land of less than 10 acres each that are
located in the same county and that are receiving the farm or agricultural use assessment;
(v) parcels of woodland of less than 5 acres excluding the homesite;
or
(vi) land that fails to meet the gross income requirement of
subsection (g) of this section.
(2) No more than 2 parcels of less than 3 acres under the same ownership
may qualify for the agricultural use assessment.
(i) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Surviving spouse” means the surviving spouse of the property
owner who applied for the waiver under this subsection if the surviving spouse has not
remarried and had a legal interest in the property at the time of the application for the
waiver.
(iii) “3–year cycle” has the meaning stated in § 8–103 of this title.
(2) The Director may grant a waiver from the requirements of subsection
(e) or (g) of this section if:
(i) the property owner is at least 70 years of age;
(ii) the property owner applies to the Department for a waiver of the
requirements of either subsection (e) or (g) of this section;
(iii) the land has not changed ownership during the two previous
3–year cycles; and
(iv) the land has been assessed for at least the two previous 3–year
cycles on the basis of farm or agricultural use under the law or regulations of the
Department that were in effect as of the date of the application.
(3) The Director may grant a waiver from the requirements of subsection
(e) or (g) of this section if:
(i) the property owner becomes disabled and is unable to continue
the farm or agricultural use of the land;
(ii) the property owner applies to the Department for a waiver of the
requirements of either subsection (e) or (g) of this section;

HOUSE BILL 81
(iii) the property owner engaged in farm or agricultural use activities
on the land prior to the disability; and
(iv) the land has been assessed for at least the two previous 3–year
cycles on the basis of farm or agricultural use under the law or regulations of the
Department that were in effect as of the date of the application.
(4) Any waiver granted under this subsection shall be in effect until:
(i) the transfer of the property; or
(ii) the later of the death of the property owner who received the
waiver or the death of the surviving spouse.
(5) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of
this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any condemnation
proceeding initiated on or after January 1, 2024.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.